Hawaii statutes.
§36-27 Transfers from special funds
for central service expenses. (a) Except as provided in this
section, and notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, from time to time,
the director of finance, for the purpose of defraying the prorated estimate of
central service expenses of government in relation to all special funds, except
the:

(1) Special out-of-school time instructional program
fund under section 302A-1310;

(2) School cafeteria special funds of the department
of education;

(3) Special funds of the University of Hawaii;

(4) [Repealed July 1, 2023. L 2013, c 157, §9(1).]
State educational facilities improvement special fund;

(5) Convention center enterprise special fund under
section 201B-8;

(6) Special funds established by section 206E-6;

(7) Aloha Tower fund created by section 206J-17;

(8) Funds of the employees' retirement system created
by section 88-109;

(9) Hawaii hurricane relief fund established under
chapter 431P;

(10) Hawaii health systems corporation special funds
and the subaccounts of its regional system boards;

(11) Tourism special fund established under section
201B-11;

(12) Universal service fund established under section
269-42;

(13) Emergency and budget reserve fund under section
328L-3;

(14) Public schools special fees and charges fund
under section 302A-1130;

(15) Sport fish special fund under section 187A-9.5;

[(16)] Neurotrauma special fund under section 321H-4;

[(17)] Glass advance disposal fee established by section
342G-82;

[(18)] Center for nursing special fund under section
304A-2163;

[(19)] Passenger facility charge special fund
established by section 261-5.5;

[(20)] Solicitation of funds for charitable purposes
special fund established by section 467B-15;

[(21)] Land conservation fund established by section
173A-5;

[(22)] Court interpreting services revolving fund under
section 607-1.5;

[(23)] Trauma system special fund under section
321-22.5;

[(24)] Hawaii cancer research special fund;

[(25)] Community health centers special fund;

[(26)] Emergency medical services special fund;

[(27)] Rental motor vehicle customer facility charge
special fund established under section 261-5.6;

[(28)] Shared services technology special fund under
section 27-43;

[(29)] Automated victim information and notification
system special fund established under section 353-136;

[(30)] Deposit beverage container deposit special fund
under section 342G-104;

[(31)] [Repealed December 31, 2016. L 2015, c
70, §3.] Hospital sustainability program special fund under Act 217,
Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, as amended;

[(32)] [Repealed December 31, 2016. L 2015, c 69, §3.]
Nursing facility sustainability program special fund under Act 156, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2012;

[(33)] Hawaii 3R's school improvement fund under section
302A-1502.4;

[(34)] After-school plus program revolving fund under
section 302A-1149.5; and

[(35)] Civil monetary penalty special fund under section
321-30.2,

shall deduct five per cent of all receipts of all other
special funds, which deduction shall be transferred to the general fund of the
State and become general realizations of the State. All officers of the State
and other persons having power to allocate or disburse any special funds shall
cooperate with the director in effecting these transfers. To determine the
proper revenue base upon which the central service assessment is to be
calculated, the director shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 for the
purpose of suspending or limiting the application of the central service
assessment of any fund. No later than twenty days prior to the convening of
each regular session of the legislature, the director shall report all central
service assessments made during the preceding fiscal year.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law to the
contrary, the director shall deposit three per cent of all moneys collected
pursuant to subsection (a) into the shared services technology special fund
established pursuant to section 27-43. [L 1955, c 247, §1; RL 1955, §132-16; am
L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §14; am L 1963, c 114, §1; am L 1964, c 34, §1A; am L 1967,
c 281, §2; HRS §36-27; am L 1969, c 269, §1; am L 1970, c 115, §1; am L 1976, c
123, §1; am L 1986, c 123, §1; am L 1989, c 368, §4; am L 1993, c 280, §44; am
L Sp 1993, c 7, §14; am L 1994, c 106, §1, c 136, §1, c 137, §1, and c 232, §4;
am L 1995, c 161, §5 and c 211, §§3, 17; am L Sp 1995, c 11, §6; am L 1996, c
89, §3 and c 123, §1; am L 1997, c 123, §1, c 124, §3, and c 216, §§3, 13; am L
1998, c 115, §6, c 142, §2, c 156, §4, and c 311, §3; am L 1999, c 98, §2, c 129,
§2, c 135, §1, c 155, §2, c 163, §8, c 194, §1, and c 304, §3; am L 2000, c
205, §3 and c 297, §23; am L 2001, c 163, §2, c 239, §3, and c 270, §4; am L
2002, c 16, §4, c 39, §2, c 86, §1, c 160, §3, c 176, §6, and c 253, §4; am L
2003, c 177, §2, c 179, §1, and c 198, §4; am L 2004, c 93, §2 and c 101, §1;
am L 2005, c 156, §2 and c 184, §2; am L 2006, c 75, §3, c 305, §3, and c 316,
§4; am L 2007, c 9, §2 and c 290, §7; am L 2008, c 226, §3; am L 2009, c 79, §§27,
34(3); am L 2010, c 200, §3; am L 2011, c 84, §3; am L 2012, c 190, §2; am L
2013, c 100, §2, c 157, §3 and c 228, §1; am L 2014, c 123, §3, c 124, §§3,
7(3) and c 232, §2; am L 2015, c 69, §3, c 70, §4, c 71, §2, and c 237, §14]

Note

L 2015, c 121 does not specifically amend this section but
§171-172(d), enacted by L 2015, c 121, §2, exempts the Turtle Bay conservation
easement special fund from the central service expenses of this section.

Act 156, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, referred to in
subsection (a)(32), was amended by Act 142, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013, Act
124, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014, and Act 69, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015.

Act 217, Session Laws of Hawaii 2012, referred to in
subsection (a)(31), was amended by Act 141, Session Laws of Hawaii 2013, Act
123, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014, and Act 70, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next